da: Seidingtype for lilletromme: Kabelseiding; Dunnett-style; Parallel action; Standard-throw-off; Trick-style multi-step; Andet
nl: Snaredrum strainer type: Kabelstrainer; Dunnett-stijl; Parallelle actie; Standaard throw-off; Trick-stijl multi-step; Anders
tr: Trampet gergi tipi: Kablolu kord; Dunnett stili; Paralel etkili; Standart açma kapama; Trick stili çok kademeli; Diğer
ja: スネアドラムストレーナータイプ: ケーブルストレイナー; Dunnett スタイル; パラレルアクション; スタンダードストレイナー; Trick スタイルマルチステップ; その他
zh-CN: 军鼓响弦调节类型: 钢缆式松紧器; Dunnett 风格; 平行制动; 标准松紧器; Trick 风格多步式; 其他
el: Τύπος φίλτρου ταμπούρου: Χορδιέρα με καλώδιο; Τύπου Dunnett; Παράλληλης δράσης; Τυπικό throw-off; Πολλαπλών βημάτων τύπου Trick; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta mrežice malega bobna: Mehanizem s kablom; Slog Dunnett; Vzporedno delovanje; Standardni mehanizem; Večstopenjski slog Trick; Drugo
ko: 스네어 드럼 스트레이너 타입: 케이블 스트레이너; 더넷 스타일; 패럴렐 액션; 표준 스로오프; 트릭 스타일 멀티스텝; 기타
lt-LT: Mažojo būgno strainerio tipas: Kabelinis įtempiklis; „Dunnett“ stiliaus; Lygiagretus veikimas; Standartinis nuleidiklis; „Trick“ stiliaus daugiapakopis; Kita
fi: Virvelirummun mattotyyppi: Vaijerimatto; Dunnett-tyylinen; Rinnakkaistoiminen; Vakiomallinen mattokoneisto; Trick-tyylinen moniportainen; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de mecanism de acționare a cordarului pentru toba mică: Cordar cu cablu; Tip Dunnett; Acțiune paralelă; Mecanism standard; Multi-step tip Trick; Altele
pt-BR: Caixa tipo de automático da esteira: Automático a cabo; Estilo Dunnett; Ação paralela; Automático padrão; Estilo Trick em várias etapas; Outro
ru: Тип машинки малого барабана: Тросовая машинка; В стиле Dunnett; Параллельного действия; Стандартная машинка; Многоступенчатая в стиле Trick; Другое
de: Typ des Snare-Abhebers: Kabelabhebung; Dunnett-Style; Parallelabhebung; Standard-Abhebung; Trick-Style Multi-Step; Andere
sv: Typ av avstängningsanordning för virveltrumma: Kabelsejarsträng; Dunnett-stil; Parallell action; Standard sejarmekanik; Trick-stil med flera steg; Övrigt
it: Tipo di tenditore del fusto del rullante: Tendicordiera a cavo; Stile Dunnett; Ad azione parallela; Sgancio standard; Multi-step stile Trick; Altro
pl: Typ naciągu werbla: Maszynka linkowa; W stylu Dunnett; Mechanizm równoległy; Standardowa maszynka; Wielostopniowa w stylu Trick; Inny
sk-SK: Typ sitka pre malý bubon: Lankový napínač; V štýle Dunnett; Paralelná akcia; Štandardný napínač; Viacstupňový v štýle Trick; Iné
vi: Loại lưới lọc trống bẫy: Bộ căng dây cáp; Kiểu Dunnett; Hoạt động song song; Cần gạt tiêu chuẩn; Kiểu Trick nhiều nấc; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de tensão do tambor de tarola: Esticador de cabo; Tipo Dunnett; Ação paralela; Automático padrão; Múltiplos passos tipo Trick; Outro
es: Tipo de mecanismo de tensión de la caja: Tensor de cable; Estilo Dunnett; Acción paralela; Tensor estándar; Multipasos estilo Trick; Otro
en: Snare drum strainer type: Cable strainer; Dunnett-style; Parallel action; Standard throw-off; Trick-style multi-step; Other
cs: Typ sítka pro virbl: Lanko; Typ Dunnett; Paralelní; Standardní odklápěcí; Vícestupňový typu Trick; Jiné
th: ตัวปรับความตึงกลองสแนร์: สเตรนเนอร์แบบสายเคเบิล; สไตล์ Dunnett; พาราเรลแอกชัน; โทรว์ออฟแบบมาตรฐาน; สไตล์ Trick แบบหลายระดับ; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de déclencheur de caisse claire: Déclencheur à câble; Style Dunnett; Action parallèle; Déclencheur standard; Style Trick à plusieurs niveaux; Autre
nb: Type strammer for skarptromme: Kabelseide; Dunnett-stil; Parallellmekanisme; Standard seide-utløser; Trick-stil flertrinns; Annet
zh-TW: 小鼓響弦開關類型: 鋼纜響弦; Dunnett 樣式; 平行式; 標準響弦開關; Trick 樣式多段式; 其他
hu: Pergődob-sodronyfeszítő típusa: Kábeles sodrony; Dunnett stílusú; Párhuzamos működésű; Standard sodronyváltó; Trick stílusú, többlépcsős; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta sita za doboš: Mrežica sa sajlom; U stilu Dunnett; Paralelno djelovanje; Standardni mehanizam za otpuštanje; Trick višestupanjski; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип на обтегача на струните на малкия барабан: Кабелен механизъм; Тип Dunnett; Паралелно действие; Стандартно освобождаване; Многостъпков тип Trick; Друго